Utah statutes.
58-9-606.   Right to rely -- Immunity.

(1)  A person signing a funeral service agreement, cremation authorization form, or other authorization for a decedent's disposition warrants the truthfulness of the facts set forth in the document, including the identity of the decedent and the person's authority to order the disposition.

(2)  A funeral service establishment has the right to rely on a contract or authorization executed under Subsection (1) and may carry out the instructions of the person whom its funeral service director reasonably believes holds the right of disposition.

(3)  A funeral service director incurs no civil or criminal liability for failure to contact or independently investigate the existence of any next-of-kin or relative of the decedent.

(4)  If there are at least two persons in the nearest class of the next-of-kin who are equal in priority and a funeral service director has no knowledge of an objection by other members of the class, the funeral service director may rely on and act according to the instructions of the first person in the class to make funeral and disposition arrangements.

(5)  A funeral service establishment or funeral service director who relies in good faith on the instructions of a person claiming the right of disposition under this part is immune from civil and criminal liability and disciplinary action in carrying out the disposition of a decedent's remains in accordance with that person's instructions.

